Utah statutes.
63M-11-103.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Aging" and "aged" are as defined in Section 62A-3-101.
(2)  "Center on Aging" means the Center on Aging within the University of
Utah.
(3)  "Commission" means the Utah Commission on Aging, created in Section
63M-11-102.
